Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.140

Written records required—Penalty.

Every person engaged in the business of selling goods or real estate at auction shall keep written records for a period of three years available for inspection which indicate clearly the name and address of the owner or consignor of the goods or real estate, the terms of acceptance and sale, and a copy of the signed written contract required by RCW 18.11.130. A person who violates this section shall be subject to an administrative fine in a sum not exceeding five hundred dollars for each violation.

[ 1986 c 324 s 10; 1982 c 205 s 12.]